Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 2. Premiums and Rates

§ 27-14-201.
Rates and classifications; rate surcharge.

The worker’s compensation program shall be neither more nor less than self-supporting. Employments affected by this act shall be divided by the division into classes, whose rates may be readjusted annually as the division actuarially determines. Any employer may contest his classification as determined by the division following the contested case provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act except that the division shall carry the burden of proving that the classification is correct. Information shall be kept of the amounts collected and expended in each class for actuarially determining rates, but for payment of compensation, the worker’s compensation account shall be one and indivisible.

If it is determined at any time and in any manner that a determination by the division of an industrial or employment classification is incorrect, premiums under any corrected classification shall be charged only from the date of change in classification. This subsection shall not apply to any employer’s categorization of an employee’s gross earnings to an industrial or employment classification.

Upon compliance with the rate making provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and written approval by the governor, the division shall determine the hazards of the different classes of employments and fix the premiums therefor at the lowest rate consistent with maintenance of an actuarially sound worker’s compensation account and the creation of actuarially sound surplus and reserves, and for such purpose shall adopt a system of rating in such a manner as to take account of the peculiar hazard of each risk, mathematically and equally based on actual costs to the program in terms of number and extent of injuries and deaths, and shall use consultants or rating organizations as it determines necessary. The department shall submit an annual report with respect to proposed annual rate adjustments under this section to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee no later than October 1 of the year preceding the implementation of the rate adjustment. The total annual rate adjustment for any employment classification under this section is subject to the following limitations:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 1994, ch. 86, § 3.

and (iv) Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 117, § 2.

For the calendar year commencing January 1, 1999 and each calendar year thereafter, any increase in the base rate for each employment classification shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the base rate imposed for that employment classification during the immediately preceding year;

To compensate for the difference between revenues generated under base rate adjustment limitations imposed under paragraph (c)(v) of this section and revenues which would have been generated if base rates had been adjusted without limitations, the division may limit base rate decreases for any employment classification by not more than fifty percent (50%) of the actuarially determined decrease;

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 117, § 2.

In determining rates under this section for employers specified under W.S. 27-14-108(a)(ii)(G)(I), the division shall base the rates on one (1) rate classification for sales personnel and one (1) rate classification for all other personnel other than clerical;

Notwithstanding paragraph (v) of this subsection, for the calendar year beginning January 1, 2003, rates shall be adjusted to reflect the reclassification of industry codes in accordance with the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) manual, but in no case shall the base premium rate for any classification for the calendar year beginning January 1, 2003 exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the lowest base rate assigned to any employer in that classification under the standard industrial classification manual for the preceding year.

In addition, the plan of rating shall use an experience rating system based on three (3) years claim experience, or as much thereof as is available, for employers enrolled under it. This system shall reward employers with a better than average claim experience, penalize employers with a worse than average claim experience and may provide for premium volume discount so long as the account remains actuarially sound. Discounts from or penalties added to base employment classification rates because of claim experience shall not exceed sixty-five percent (65%) for rates through calendar year 2016 and shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) for rates beginning with calendar year 2017. An employer who is current on premium payments required by this act may apply to the division for a determination of experience modification rating chargeability for an injury to the employer’s employee. The division’s determination of chargeability shall be reviewable as provided in W.S. 27-14-601(k)(iii) and (iv). If the division, by a preponderance of the evidence, determines that an employee’s injury was primarily caused by a third party, the injury shall not be charged to the employer’s account. The employer shall bear the burden of proof in any action brought by the employer for a chargeability determination. If an employer’s account is determined to be unchargeable under this subsection, the employer’s account shall not be further credited upon recovery from a third party by the division. The division shall by rule and regulation establish necessary procedures for a determination of chargeability. Any determination by the division regarding causation of an injury pursuant to this subsection shall be used only for ratemaking purposes and shall not be admissible in any civil litigation regarding the injury.

The division in fixing rates shall provide for the costs of benefits and the expenses of administering the worker’s compensation account allowed by law, subject to the following:

The account shall be one (1) account but shall include provision for all expenses allowed by this act, loss adjustment expenses and unpaid losses, including:

Case reserves;

Future development on known claims;

Reopened claims reserve;

Claims incurred but not reported;

Claims incurred and reported but not yet recorded;

An actuarially reasonable contingency margin to reflect the uncertainty inherent in estimates of unpaid losses and loss adjustment expenses.

The account shall be fully reserved on or before December 31, 2013;

The division shall annually obtain a report from a qualified actuary rendering an opinion regarding the reasonableness of the booked loss and loss adjustment expense reserve and carried contingency reserve;

The division shall provide the opinion required by paragraph (iii) of this subsection to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee, or its successor, by November 1 of each year;

For purposes of calculating reserves, future liabilities shall be discounted to present value using a discount factor selected by the division. The discount factor selected by the division and the reason for its selection shall be included in the annual report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee or its successor;

The collection through premiums of any deficiency in reserves and surpluses that exceeds five percent (5%) of the fund balance shall be averaged over a ten (10) year period;

For purposes of this section:

“Fully reserved” means that the workers’ compensation account established by W.S.

27-14-701

has, in the opinion of a qualified actuary, funds sufficient on a discounted basis to provide for all unpaid loss and loss adjustment expenses as well as an actuarially appropriate provision for adverse contingencies;

“Qualified actuary” means a person who is a fellow of the Casualty Actuarial Society or who has been approved as qualified for signing casualty loss reserve opinions by the Casualty Practice Council of the American Academy of Actuaries.

The division is given full power and authority to annually determine premium rates and classifications according to the standards set forth under subsections (b), (c) and (d) of this section provided that no change in the classification or rates prescribed shall be effective until thirty (30) days after the date of the order making the change.

Policies or statements of coverage may be issued to each covered employer. The division shall collect all costs in certifying coverage under this act from the person requesting the certification except for one (1) policy or statement of coverage which may be issued to the employer at no charge.

Approximate rates applicable to each employer pursuant to this section shall be annually provided to the employer by October 1.

All data and formulas used by the division, including the employment classification base rate and claim experience rating, to determine rates for an employer shall be made available to the employer upon request of the employer.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 149, § 3; 1994, ch. 86, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 94, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 117, § 2.

The division shall in accordance with its rules and regulations, grant a discount to rates established under this section in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the base rate for the employment classification of any employer if the employer complies with a safety program approved by the division and a discount in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the base rate for the employment classification if the employer complies with a drug and alcohol testing program approved by the division and a discount in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the base rate for the employment classification if the employer complies with a health and safety consultation program developed by the department of workforce services in consultation with the occupational health and safety commission. In no instance shall the sum total of discounts under this subsection exceed thirty percent (30%) of the base rate for the employment classification for the employer. The discount for the health and safety consultation program shall only remain in effect for three (3) years after the employer is certified to be in compliance with the health and safety consultation program recommendations. In determining safety program approval, drug and alcohol program approval, health and safety consultation program approval and the total discount granted under this subsection, the division shall consider:

The probability the program will reduce the number of accidents and the probable savings which may be realized from the reduction;

Relevant experience, if any, depicting actual reduction in accidents and actual savings which is compared to an industry standard;

The adequacy and accuracy of determining participation in the program and the eligibility for a discount by individual employers;

The administrative costs incurred by the division in implementing a rate discount for an applicable employment classification;

Whether the employer adopts and enforces policies establishing a drug-free workplace which may include an employee assistance program to assist employees with alcohol or other drug problems. The division shall follow rules adopted by the department of workforce services in consultation with the department of health for the effective implementation of this paragraph. Rules adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall not impose on any employer the requirement to pay the costs of treatment or any other intervention. Employers enrolled in a safety discount program under this paragraph shall have one (1) year from the effective date of those rules within which to come into compliance.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 117, § 2.

The division may, in accordance with its rules and regulations, grant a premium credit to rates established under this section if it is determined by a qualified actuary retained by the division that the fund will remain fully reserved after the premium credit is granted and implemented. If the division determines to grant a premium credit, the percentage of credit allowed for the rate year shall be the same for all employers qualified pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection. The following provisions shall also apply to the premium credit program:

The premium credit can only be used to offset premiums, and in no case can the premium be redeemed by an employer for cash;

Any premium credits shall expire as provided by law. If no law provides for the expiration of credits, credits shall expire as determined by the division;

The premium credit, if granted, shall only be given to those employers who paid premiums during the preceding year and whose accounts are current on all amounts owed under the act, including premiums, case cost liability and penalties.

In an industrial classification with less than twelve (12) employers in which a single employer contributes greater than fifty percent (50%) of the total premium in that classification, the director of the department of workforce services, with the concurrence of the governor, may adjust the base rate for the employer established pursuant to this section, not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) subject to the following:

An affected employer submits a written application to the division in the format prescribed by the division after October 1 and before December 31 of the year preceding the year in which the adjustment will be made;

The affected employer’s experience modification rating is lower than the average for the employer’s industrial classification;

The director determines that the employer has been adversely affected due to the distribution of premiums within the industrial classification; and

The employer is contributing less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total premium of the industrial classification.

Any loss of premium due to an adjustment pursuant to subsection (r) of this section shall be distributed among all rate classes in the annual base rate adjustment in the year subsequent to the year in which the adjustment was made.

The division may, in accordance with its rules and regulations, create and implement a premium deductible program. The following provisions shall apply to the premium deductible program:

Participating employers shall sign a contract with the division, clearly identifying the terms of the program;

Participating employers shall be assigned a reduced industry base rate for premium calculation purposes. The industry base rate reduction shall be determined in a manner that reflects the dollar amount of the deductible and is consistent with an actuarially sound workers’ compensation account;

Participating employers shall be financially stable and in good standing with the division;

Participating employers shall report all work injuries within the timeframes specified in W.S.

27-14-506

;

Participating employers failing to meet the requirements of the premium deductible program shall have their premium base rate reinstated at the full industry base rate, retroactive to the reporting period in which the employer first became noncompliant. Employers whose premium base rate is reinstated at the full industry base rate under this paragraph shall not be re-eligible for the premium deductible program for a minimum of eight (8) calendar quarters;

Participation in the premium deductible program cannot be transferred to a successor employer nor can it be incorporated as part of a merger among employing units.

No compensable injury related to COVID-19 that occurs during the period beginning January 1, 2020 and ending March 31, 2022 for which coverage is provided under this act and for which a claim was filed on or before March 31, 2023 shall be chargeable to an employer’s experience rating under this section.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1987, ch. 94, § 2; 1989, ch. 149, §§ 1, 3; 1991, ch. 219, § 1; 1994, ch. 86, §§ 2, 3; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; 1996, ch. 71, § 1; 1998, ch. 117, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 184, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 30, § 1; ch. 81, § 2; 2003, ch. 185, § 1; 2005, ch. 60, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 1, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 169, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 2022 ch. 16, § 1, effective March 8, 2022.

Cross references. —

For provisions pertaining to compliance checks, see §

12-6-103

.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 60, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (e) to extend the deadline for the workers' compensation account to be fully funded, clarify reserve and surplus requirements for the fund, and provide for discounting of reserves.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, substituted “account” for “fund” in the second sentence in (d).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out above incorporating changes made by both 2005 acts.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote the introductory language of (o) by adding the discount amount, and inserting “drug and alcohol program approval.”

The 2008 amendment,

made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (q), substituted “if it is determined by a qualified actuary retained by the division that the fund will remain fully reserved after the premium credit is granted and implemented.
If the division determines to grant a premium credit, the percentage of credit allowed for the rate year shall be the same for all employers qualified pursuant to paragraph (iii) of this subsection” for “in an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the investment earnings after inflation on reserves for the prior rate year.
Of the total amount of premium credit distribution established by the division, fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed to all employers who made premium payments to the fund in the preceding year and fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed to employers whose accident frequency and injury severity in the preceding year was less than that of the industry classification under which the employer is classified. The fifty percent (50%) distribution to all employers who made premium payments shall be made on the basis of each employer's annual premium payment as compared to total premium payments made by all employers in the year preceding the year in which the premium credit was issued”; and added (q)(iii).

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 1,
in (e)(vii)(A), substituted “27-14-701” for “27-14-101.”

Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 5(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2009.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (o)(v) and (r).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “shall” for “may” at the beginning of (o); and added “and a discount in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the base rate for the employment classification if the employer complies with a health and safety consultation program developed by the department of workforce services in consultation with the occupational health and safety commission. In no instance shall the sum total of discounts under this subsection exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the base rate for the employment classification for the employer. The discount for the health and safety consultation program shall only remain in effect for three (3) years after the employer is certified to be in compliance with the health and safety consultation program recommendations” following “the division”; and added “, health and safety consultation program approval” following “program approval” in (o).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (d), added “for rates through calendar year 2016 and shall not exceed eighty-five percent (85%) for rates beginning with calendar year 2017” in the third sentence.

The second
2015 amendment, by ch. 184, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (d), eliminated the fourth sentence and added the last seven sentences.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (o), substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “five percent (5%)” in the first sentence, and substituted “thirty percent (30%)” for “twenty-five percent (25%)” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

in (q)(i), deleted the first sentence which read “The premium credit to an employer may be applied only against premiums due in the year in which the credit was issued,” rewrote (q)(ii) which read “Any premium credits unclaimed at the end of the year shall expire,” and added (u).

Laws 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 7 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved May 20, 2020.

The 2022 amendment,

in (u), added “compensable” preceding “injury,” “that occurs during the period beginning January 1, 2020 and ending March 31, 2022” following “COVID-19,” substituted “March 31, 2023” for “December 30, 2020” and deleted the former second sentence, which read, “The division shall estimate the cost to the fund of an injury subject to this subsection and shall deposit into the fund or dedicate within the fund the amount of the estimated cost but only to the extent federal monies are available for that purpose from the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-136, or from any other available federal monies related to the COVID-19 emergency response.”

Laws 2022, ch. 16, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 8, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

see note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., Ch. 2, § 5, provides: “(a)
Pursuant to
W.S. 27-14-201(q), and in addition to the premium credit provided by 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146, Section 1, Enrolled Act No. 49, the department of workforce services shall establish a premium credit for any employer who has made all required worker's compensation payments for the period beginning January 1, 2019 and ending December 31, 2019.
To qualify for the credit, an employer shall be in good standing with the worker's compensation division within the department of workforce services for all required worker's compensation payments by June 15, 2020.
Premium credits granted under this section shall become effective on July 1, 2020 and may be used for premium reporting periods from July 1, 2020 through June 30, 2021.
Any unused credit will expire June 30, 2021.

“(b)
Notwithstanding premium payment requirements under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act, W.S. 27 14 101 through

27-14-806

, the department of workforce services may grant an employer that is current on its required premium payments under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act a delay in the payment of premiums after applying any premium credits granted under subsection (a) of this section. The department may promulgate rules to grant a delay in premium payments under this subsection for any duration that will maintain the solvency of the workers compensation program and to the extent that funding is made available through the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-136, or from any other available federal funds related to the COVID-19 emergency response, to offset the delayed premiums.”

Remedy for improper charging of experience rating. —

While an employer asserted that it was not afforded notice or an opportunity to be heard before worker compensation benefits were paid to an injured employee, a hearing officer did not have the authority, pursuant to § 27-14-603(e), to remedy the situation by ordering the division to charge benefits to an industrial class as a whole rather than a single employer. Section 27-14-603(e) is not ambiguous and clearly instructs the division, not the office of administrative hearings, to charge benefits against the industrial classification in only one specific situation: where the series of injuries which entitles the employee to benefits does not permit determination of which single employer is to be charged. An adequate remedy for employers who allege division mistakes cause the employer's experience rating to be improperly charged is to petition the division to remove any charges from its experience rating which arose as a result of the division's own neglect, mistake or inadvertence, pursuant to this section. Olsten Temporary Servs. v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Nyquist), 870 P.2d 360,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1994).

Stated

in

Stratman v. Admiral Beverage Corp., 760 P.2d 974,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 27-14-202.
Premium payments; payroll reports; department authority to establish joint reporting; remedies for incorrect earnings categorizations by employers.

Except as provided under subsection (e) of this section, each employer shall forward to the division on forms provided by the division, a true copy of the payroll of his employees engaged in extrahazardous employment during the current calendar month or quarterly reporting period, certified and affirmed by himself or a person having knowledge of the payrolls under penalty of perjury. Payroll reports and monthly payments under this act shall be submitted on or before the last day of the month following the month in which the earnings are paid, unless otherwise provided by rule and regulation of the division.

The director may permit an employer to file payroll reports for quarterly payroll periods ending March 31, June 30, September 30 and December 31 if the diligence of prior reporting payment of premium and other factors warrant. The privilege of quarterly reporting may be revoked by the division if an employer is delinquent in reporting or making payments in accordance with this act. Upon notice of revocation, the employer shall file payroll reports on a monthly basis. Quarterly payroll reports shall be filed and payments made on or before the last day of the month following the quarterly periods.

An employer shall notify the director at the time he ceases to employ individuals in covered employment.

Any employer or joint employer contributing as required by this act and employing employees or joint employees covered under this act that would qualify as separate classifications, may elect to report gross earnings of the covered entities under one (1) consolidated Wyoming worker’s compensation account. A payroll report submitted pursuant to this subsection shall classify the employer’s payroll under separate industrial classifications specified under W.S.

27-14-108

. Any employer electing to report under a consolidated account shall provide written notice to the division of its intent. The election shall remain in effect for one (1) year or until withdrawn in writing, whichever occurs later. Any employer or joint employer contributing as required by this act and employing employees or joint employees covered by this act who elects to report the payrolls under one (1) consolidated account pursuant to this subsection shall be treated as a single employer for all purposes of this act with the exception of determining the experience rating pursuant to W.S. 27-14-201(d) and the premium tax credit pursuant to W.S. 27-14-201(q).

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an employer may elect to submit payroll reports and make premium payments in advance pursuant to rule and regulation of the division. In its rules and regulations established under this subsection, the division shall provide for adjustment of premium payments for any fiscal year in accordance with overpayments or underpayments made during the preceding fiscal year.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section and commencing January 1, 1994, governmental entity employers shall make payments for rates established by the division under W.S.

27-14-201

for any calendar year commencing on July 1 of that calendar year and ending June 30 of the immediately succeeding calendar year. For purposes of this subsection “governmental entity employer” includes state, county, municipal, school district, community college, university and special district employers.

The department of workforce services shall by rule and regulation establish a joint payroll reporting system for the purposes of the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act and Wyoming Employment Security Law. Nothing in this subsection shall require the department to provide a joint payroll reporting system to all qualifying employers.

An employer’s categorization in its payroll reports of an employee’s gross earnings to the appropriate industrial or employment classification shall be in accordance with division rules and regulations. If the division finds any employee gross earnings to be incorrectly categorized to an industrial or employment classification, the division shall within a one (1) year period beginning with the current rate year and including the previous rate year, credit or debit the employer’s account for the overpayment or underpayment as appropriate. The division shall waive any underpayment amount, interest, penalties or claim reimbursements if the incorrect employee gross earnings categorization was caused by reliance on a written determination of the division and the employer provided full and truthful disclosure of all pertinent information in requesting a determination or if the employer makes a good faith error in categorization. The division may waive any interest, penalties or claim reimbursement caused by an underpayment due to an otherwise incorrect employee gross earning categorization of an employee’s earnings in any other case if it determines there are sufficient extraordinary circumstances which warrant a waiver. If an employer’s account has been debited pursuant to this subsection, the employer shall not be considered contributing as required by this act if he does not pay the underpayment within thirty (30) days of his account being debited or within thirty (30) days of completion of any appeals of the determination of an underpayment, whichever occurs later.

The division, on or about the fifteenth of the month following the due date, shall send a written notice of delinquency to an employer failing to submit a report as required by this section. An employer failing to submit a report required by this section within thirty (30) days of the date due shall, in addition to any delinquent premium penalty pursuant to W.S.

27-14-203

, be assessed a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each delinquent report.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 29, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; ch. 226, § 1; 1993, ch. 96, § 1; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; ch. 205, § 1; 1998, ch. 117, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; 2006, ch. 2, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to perjury in judicial, legislative or administrative proceedings, see §

6-5-301

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (j).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “which budget upon a fiscal year basis beginning on July 1” following “special district employers” in the last sentence of (f).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (g).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Constitutionality. —

A former provision requiring employers to contribute to common fund for compensation of injuries to workmen, irrespective of whether such injuries were caused by employer's negligence, was held not to violate the fourteenth amendment to the federal constitution as a deprivation of property without due process of law. Zancanelli v. Central Coal & Coke Co., 25 Wyo. 511, 173 P. 981,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1918).

Payment in nature of tax. —

Compensation awards differ from ordinary debts of corporation, being an obligation imposed by law arising from relationship existing between employer and employee, and they are in the nature of a tax. State ex rel. Christensen v. Nugget Coal Co., 60 Wyo. 51, 144 P.2d 944,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1944).

Not in nature of insurance premiums. —

Each employer shall pay, as nearly as possible, amount paid out of industrial accident fund as compensation to or on behalf of his own employees and payments made are not in nature of insurance premiums. State ex rel. Christensen v. Nugget Coal Co., 60 Wyo. 51, 144 P.2d 944,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 1944).

Limited liability accident insurance. —

Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act was not intended to give compensation as damages, but is in nature of accident insurance, a compromise between employers and employed whereby in exchange for limited liability employer pays some claims where in past no liability existed. Fuhs v. Swenson, 58 Wyo. 293, 131 P.2d 333,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1942).

Monthly payroll reports. —

A worker's compensation claimant's corporate officer coverage was not withdrawn by his employer's failure to return to the worker's compensation division an affidavit affirming the claimant's exposure to hazards; however, the corporation did withdraw officer coverage when it stopped listing the claimant as a corporate officer on its monthly reports filed pursuant to subsection (a), and when it stopped submitting a premium for his coverage at the same time. Newton v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 922 P.2d 863,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1996).

Consolidated account for affiliated corporations required division approval. —

Under the pre-1986 provisions, affiliated corporations could report their payrolls and pay their premiums under a single consolidated account. However, such an arrangement required the express approval and knowledge of the division to qualify as “contributing as required by this act,” as required by former § 27-12-103 (see now §

27-14-104

). Stratman v. Admiral Beverage Corp., 760 P.2d 974,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1988), reh'g denied,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. Sept. 20, 1988).

Single employer paying through joint account entitled to immunity. —

A single employer that makes its payments to the worker's compensation fund through a joint account entered into with other affiliated business entities is considered to have made its contributions as required by law and is entitled to the immunity set forth in this chapter. Lankford v. True Ranches, 822 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1991).

Cited in

Knight v. Estate of McCoy, 2015 WY 9, 2015 Wyo. LEXIS
9 (Jan. 14, 2015).

Stated in

State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 111, 384 P.3d 267,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Crediting employer or insurance carrier with earnings of employee reemployed or continued in employment, after injury, 84 ALR2d 1108.